apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="va/loir__vblex">
            
<e><p><l>ille</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ille</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>illent</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>illes</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>laient</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lais</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lais</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lait</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lant</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lant</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lent</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>lez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>liez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>liez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lions</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lions</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>loir</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lons</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lons</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>lons</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lu</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lue</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lues</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lurent</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lus</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lus</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lus</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lusse</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lussent</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lusses</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lussiez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lussions</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lut</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lûmes</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lût</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lûtes</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udra</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udrai</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udraient</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udrais</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udrais</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udrait</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udras</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udrez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udriez</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udrions</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udrons</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>udront</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ut</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>loir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vacances__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="Gras__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="alma_mater__n">
            
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vie/il__adj">
            
<e><p><l>il</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ille</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>illes</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vie/ux__adj">
<e><p><l>ille</l><r>ux<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>illes</l><r>ux<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>ux<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ux</l><r>ux<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ux</l><r>ux<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vie/ux__n">
<e><p><l>ille</l><r>ux<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>illes</l><r>ux<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>ux<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="curieu/x__n">
<e><p><l>se</l><r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ses</l><r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>x</l><r>x<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	
	
    <pardef n="pennsoner/__n">       
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
<e><p><l>ezed</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>            
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ien</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwerz/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>   
<e><p><l>ioù</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vitra/il__n">
<e><p><l>il</l><r>il<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ux</l><r>il<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vous__prn">
            
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

          <e lm="moeurs"><i>moeurs</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
          <e lm="quinze jours"><i>quinze<b/>jours</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
          <e lm="condition requise" a="webform"><i>condition<b/>requise</i><par n="alma_mater__n"/></e>
          <e lm="condition requise" a="webform"><p><l>conditions<b/>requises</l><r>condition<b/>requise</r></p><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
          <e lm="corail" a="fulup"><i>cora</i><par n="vitra/il__n"/></e>
          <e lm="vitrail"><i>vitra</i><par n="vitra/il__n"/></e>
          <e lm="mathématiques"><i>mathématiques</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
          <e lm="obsèques" a="webform"><i>obsèques</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
          <e lm="vacances"><i>vacances</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
		  <e lm="vêpres" a="guillaume"><i>vêpres</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
          <e lm="Gras"><i>Gras</i><par n="Gras__n"/></e>
          <e lm="vieux"><i>vie</i><par n="vie/ux__n"/></e>
          <e lm="gwerz"><i>gwerz</i><par n="gwerz/__n"/></e>
          <e lm="pennsoner"><i>pennsoner</i><par n="pennsoner/__n"/></e>
          <e lm="curieux"><i>curieu</i><par n="curieu/x__n"/></e>
          <e lm="vieil"><i>vie</i><par n="vie/il__adj"/></e>
          <e lm="vieux"><i>vie</i><par n="vie/ux__adj"/></e>
          <e lm="tout"><i>tout</i><par n="vous__prn"/></e>
          <e lm="vous"><i>vous</i><par n="vous__prn"/></e>
          <e lm="valoir"><i>va</i><par n="va/loir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="valoir la peine"><i>va</i><par n="va/loir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>peine</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>peine</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="valoir la peine de" r="LR"><i>va</i><par n="va/loir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>peine<b/>de</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>peine<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="valoir la peine de" r="LR"><i>va</i><par n="va/loir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>peine<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>peine<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="valoir la peine de" r="RL"><i>va</i><par n="va/loir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>peine<b/><a/>de</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>peine<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
          <e r="LR" lm="équivaloir"><p><l>Equiva</l><r>équiva</r></p><par n="va/loir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="équivaloir"><i>équiva</i><par n="va/loir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pierre tombale" a="webform"><i>pierre<b/>tombale</i><par n="alma_mater__n"/></e>
<e lm="pierre tombale" a="webform"><p><l>pierres<b/>tombales</l><r>pierre<b/>tombale</r></p><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
<e lm="passager clandestin" a="webform"><p><l>passagère<b/>clandestine</l><r>passager<b/>clandestin</r></p><par n="alma_mater__n"/></e>
<e lm="passager clandestin" a="webform"><p><l>passagères<b/>clandestines</l><r>passager<b/>clandestin</r></p><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
<e lm="baie vitrée" a="webform"><i>baie<b/>vitrée</i><par n="alma_mater__n"/></e>
<e lm="baie vitrée" a="webform"><p><l>baies<b/>vitrées</l><r>baie<b/>vitrée</r></p><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
<e lm="peinture murale" a="webform"><i>peinture<b/>murale</i><par n="alma_mater__n"/></e>
<e lm="peinture murale" a="webform"><p><l>peintures<b/>murales</l><r>peinture<b/>murale</r></p><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
<e lm="veillée funèbre" a="webform"><i>veillée<b/>funèbre</i><par n="alma_mater__n"/></e>
<e lm="veillée funèbre" a="webform"><p><l>veillées<b/>funèbres</l><r>veillée<b/>funèbre</r></p><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
<e lm="quilles" a="eleka">
  <i>quilles</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="élections" a="eleka">
  <i>élections</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="machines" a="eleka">
  <i>machines</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="informations" a="eleka" r="LR">
  <i>informations</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="pesetas" a="eleka">
  <i>pesetas</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="espèces" a="eleka">
  <i>espèces</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
 <e lm="RP" a="eleka">
  <i>RP</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="opérations" a="eleka">
  <i>opérations</i>
  <par n="vacances__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="démarches" a="eleka"><i>démarches</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
<e lm="ordures" a="eleka"><i>ordures</i><par n="vacances__n"/></e>
